Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1506
Violations; penalty.

Any person or persons knowingly or willfully violating any of the provisions of sections 52-1501 to 52-1505 shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than fifty dollars.

Laws 1913, c. 49, § 6, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 95;

C.S.1922, § 103;

C.S.1929, § 54-207;

R.S.1943, § 54-207;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 54-207.